Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-1008
Destination dining, defined.

Destination
dining means a real estate development primarily selling and serving prepared
food and beverage to the public in a setting with sit-down dining. In addition,
the development must offer a unique food or experience concept not found in
this state within (1) the same metropolitan statistical area as determined
by the United States Office of Management and Budget and (2) a fifty-mile
radius of the development.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 8.